Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5603XS (2) 91 mb/md S.F. 2331 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 284.3B Classroom supply stipend. 1 1. For the school year beginning July 1, 2026, and each 2 succeeding school year, each school district shall provide a 3 classroom supply stipend in the amount of two hundred fifty 4 dollars to each eligible teacher employed by the school 5 district. For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 6 2026, there is appropriated from the general fund of the state 7 to the department of education an amount necessary to pay the 8 classroom supply stipends under this section. 9 2. For purposes of this section, âeligible teacherâ means a 10 teacher, as defined in this chapter, who provides instruction 11 primarily in-person and is employed by a school district prior 12 to the beginning of the school year as determined under section 13 279.10. 14 3. a. Moneys appropriated by the general assembly for 15 purposes of this section shall be distributed by the department 16 of education to school districts for classroom supply stipends. 17 The annual stipend shall be paid by the school district to 18 eligible teachers not later than September 15 of each school 19 year. 20 b. Each school district shall identify eligible teachers and 21 pay the stipend to each eligible teacher through the districtâs 22 payroll system or by separate payment without request from the 23 teacher. 24 c. Each school district shall report to the department, 25 prior to a date specified by the department and in a manner 26 prescribed by the department, the number of eligible teachers. 27 4. The stipend may be used by the eligible teacher only for 28 classroom supplies and materials that directly support student 29 learning, including books, paper, basic supplies, technology 30 and peripherals used for instruction, curriculum materials, and 31 other consumables used in the classroom. The stipend may not 32 be used for items of personal use by the teacher. 33 5. Moneys received by a school district under this section 34 shall be miscellaneous income for purposes of chapter 257 and 35 -1- LSB 5603XS (2) 91 mb/md 1/ 2 S.F. 2331 shall not be included in district cost. The stipend provided 1 under this section shall not be considered income for state 2 income tax purposes. 3